District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-221.11

Surplus assets — Distribution to creditors.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1318, ch. 854, § 778
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-221.11.
1981 Ed., § 29-411.
1973 Ed., § 29-711.